Utah statutes.
59-7-404.5.   Adjustment to apportionment factors for corporations in a combined report -- Sales factor -- Property factor.

For purposes of apportionment under Part 3, Allocation and Apportionment of Income - Utah UDITPA Provisions:

(1)  corporations filing a combined report under Section 59-7-402 or 59-7-403 may not include intercompany sales or other intercompany transactions between the corporations included in the combined report in determining the sales factor; and

(2)  corporations filing a combined report under Section 59-7-402 or 59-7-403 may not include intercompany rents or other intercompany transactions between the corporations included in the combined report in determining the property factor.

